Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB679.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1205.1(c.2) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1205.1. Continuing Professional Development.--* * *(c.2) (1) A professional education plan may include joint or cooperative professional education activities with another school entity or an institution of higher education.(2) The department shall provide professional education opportunities, resources and guidance for school entities to work collaboratively under this subsection. The professional education opportunities under this paragraph shall address the most frequent concerns from school employes across this 1234567891011121314151617181920 Commonwealth that are submitted to the department and shall be updated annually by the department.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0679PN0693 - 2 - 1234